Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8912
License required; exception.

No person or entity shall distribute, sell, or offer for sale any veterinary legend drug in this state without first obtaining a license issued by the department under the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act, except that a veterinarian licensed under the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act acting within the scope of practice of his or her profession shall not be required to be licensed under the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 12.

Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section 38-3301.